Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-103
Military code; legislative intent.

The intent of this code is to conform to all constitutional acts and regulations of the United States affecting the same subjects, and all acts of the State of Nebraska shall be construed to effect this purpose.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 2, p. 657;

C.S.1929, § 55-107;

R.S.1943, § 55-103;

Laws 1953, c. 188, § 2, p. 593.

"This code", see section 55-101.